Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-842.01
Claims; appeal and actions by city; bond not required.

No bond for costs, appeal, supersedeas, injunction, or attachment shall be required of any city of the primary class or of any officer, board, commission, head of any department, agent, or employee of any such city in any proceeding or court action in which such city or officer, board, commission, head of department, agent, or employee is a party litigant in its, his, or her official capacity.

Laws 1963, c. 52, § 1, p. 231;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 150.